Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-106
Bonds; state and district officers; approval; filing; place; recording.

The official bonds of all state and district officers except Governor shall be approved by the Governor, and filed and recorded in the office of the Secretary of State. The official bond of the Governor shall be approved by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court. The official bond of the Secretary of State shall be filed and recorded in the office of the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 6, p. 95;

R.S.1913, § 5712;

C.S.1922, § 5042;

C.S.1929, § 12-106;

R.S.1943, § 11-106.

The Governor, not the Secretary of State, approves the bond of State Treasurer, and Secretary of State can only receive, file, and record the bond. State v. Paxton, 65 Neb. 110, 90 N.W. 983 (1902); Paxton v. State, 60 Neb. 763, 84 N.W. 254 (1900).